Hawaii statutes.
§264-74 Removal of nonconforming outdoor
advertising. Any outdoor advertising lawfully in existence on May 4,
1966, and which is not in conformity with the provisions contained herein shall
be required to be removed by July 1, 1970. Any other outdoor advertising
lawfully erected which subsequently does not conform to this part shall not be
required to be removed until the end of the fifth year after it becomes
nonconforming. [L 1966, c 45, pt of §2; HRS §264-74]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next